Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.005

Intent—Finding.

The legislature intends to inspire and encourage all Washington students to dream big by creating a guaranteed tuition scholarship program for students from low-income families who enroll within one year of high school graduation. The legislature finds that, too often, financial barriers prevent many of the brightest students from considering college as a future possibility. Often the cost of tuition coupled with the complexity of finding and applying for financial aid is enough to prevent a student from even applying to college. Many students become disconnected from the education system early on and may give up or drop out before graduation. It is the intent of the legislature to alert students early in their educational career to the options and opportunities available beyond high school.

[ 2024 c 323 s 3; 2007 c 405 s 1.]